Washington statutes.
RCW 2.30.050

Courts authorized to work cooperatively.

Individual trial courts are authorized and encouraged to establish multijurisdictional partnerships and/or interlocal agreements under RCW 39.34.180 to enhance and expand the coverage area of the therapeutic court. Specifically, district and municipal courts may work cooperatively with each other and with the superior courts to identify and implement nontraditional case processing methods which can eliminate traditional barriers that decrease judicial efficiency.

[ 2015 c 291 s 6.]

NOTES:

Conflict with federal requirements—2015 c 291: See note following RCW 2.30.010.